lv_LV.aff
SFX ( Y 184
SFX (   t   ams      [^āēī]t
SFX (   t   ama      [^āēī]t
SFX (   t   amā      [^āēī]t
SFX (   t   amai     [^āēī]t
SFX (   t   amais    [^āēī]t
SFX (   t   amajā    [^āēī]t
SFX (   t   amajai   [^āēī]t
SFX (   t   amajam   [^āēī]t
SFX (   t   amajām   [^āēī]t
SFX (   t   amajās   [^āēī]t
SFX (   t   amajiem  [^āēī]t
SFX (   t   amajos   [^āēī]t
SFX (   t   amam     [^āēī]t
SFX (   t   amām     [^āēī]t
SFX (   t   amas     [^āēī]t
SFX (   t   amās     [^āēī]t
SFX (   t   ami      [^āēī]t
SFX (   t   amie     [^āēī]t
SFX (   t   amiem    [^āēī]t
SFX (   t   amo      [^āēī]t
SFX (   t   amos     [^āēī]t
SFX (   t   amu      [^āēī]t
SFX (   t   amus     [^āēī]t
SFX (   īt   āms     [^cz][ī]t
SFX (   īt   āma     [^cz][ī]t
SFX (   īt   āmam    [^cz][ī]t
SFX (   īt   āmu     [^cz][ī]t
SFX (   īt   āmā     [^cz][ī]t
SFX (   īt   āmas    [^cz][ī]t
SFX (   īt   āmai    [^cz][ī]t
SFX (   īt   āmi     [^cz][ī]t
SFX (   īt   āmiem   [^cz][ī]t
SFX (   īt   āmus    [^cz][ī]t
SFX (   īt   āmos    [^cz][ī]t
SFX (   īt   āmām    [^cz][ī]t
SFX (   īt   āmās    [^cz][ī]t
SFX (   īt   āmais   [^cz][ī]t
SFX (   īt   āmajam  [^cz][ī]t
SFX (   īt   āmo     [^cz][ī]t
SFX (   īt   āmajā   [^cz][ī]t
SFX (   īt   āmajai  [^cz][ī]t
SFX (   īt   āmie    [^cz][ī]t
SFX (   īt   āmajiem [^cz][ī]t
SFX (   īt   āmajos  [^cz][ī]t
SFX (   īt   āmajām  [^cz][ī]t
SFX (   īt   āmajās  [^cz][ī]t
SFX (   cīt  kāms     [c][ī]t
SFX (   cīt  kāma     [c][ī]t
SFX (   cīt  kāmam    [c][ī]t
SFX (   cīt  kāmu     [c][ī]t
SFX (   cīt  kāmā     [c][ī]t
SFX (   cīt  kāmas    [c][ī]t
SFX (   cīt  kāmai    [c][ī]t
SFX (   cīt  kāmi     [c][ī]t
SFX (   cīt  kāmiem   [c][ī]t
SFX (   cīt  kāmus    [c][ī]t
SFX (   cīt  kāmos    [c][ī]t
SFX (   cīt  kāmām    [c][ī]t
SFX (   cīt  kāmās    [c][ī]t
SFX (   cīt  kāmais   [c][ī]t
SFX (   cīt  kāmajam  [c][ī]t
SFX (   cīt  kāmo     [c][ī]t
SFX (   cīt  kāmajā   [c][ī]t
SFX (   cīt  kāmajai  [c][ī]t
SFX (   cīt  kāmie    [c][ī]t
SFX (   cīt  kāmajiem [c][ī]t
SFX (   cīt  kāmajos  [c][ī]t
SFX (   cīt  kāmajām  [c][ī]t
SFX (   cīt  kāmajās  [c][ī]t
SFX (   īt   āms     [^d]zīt
SFX (   īt   āma     [^d]zīt
SFX (   īt   āmam    [^d]zīt
SFX (   īt   āmu     [^d]zīt
SFX (   īt   āmā     [^d]zīt
SFX (   īt   āmas    [^d]zīt
SFX (   īt   āmai    [^d]zīt
SFX (   īt   āmi     [^d]zīt
SFX (   īt   āmiem   [^d]zīt
SFX (   īt   āmus    [^d]zīt
SFX (   īt   āmos    [^d]zīt
SFX (   īt   āmām    [^d]zīt
SFX (   īt   āmās    [^d]zīt
SFX (   īt   āmais   [^d]zīt
SFX (   īt   āmajam  [^d]zīt
SFX (   īt   āmo     [^d]zīt
SFX (   īt   āmajā   [^d]zīt
SFX (   īt   āmajai  [^d]zīt
SFX (   īt   āmie    [^d]zīt
SFX (   īt   āmajiem [^d]zīt
SFX (   īt   āmajos  [^d]zīt
SFX (   īt   āmajām  [^d]zīt
SFX (   īt   āmajās  [^d]zīt
SFX (   dzīt  gāms     [d]zīt
SFX (   dzīt  gāma     [d]zīt
SFX (   dzīt  gāmam    [d]zīt
SFX (   dzīt  gāmu     [d]zīt
SFX (   dzīt  gāmā     [d]zīt
SFX (   dzīt  gāmas    [d]zīt
SFX (   dzīt  gāmai    [d]zīt
SFX (   dzīt  gāmi     [d]zīt
SFX (   dzīt  gāmiem   [d]zīt
SFX (   dzīt  gāmus    [d]zīt
SFX (   dzīt  gāmos    [d]zīt
SFX (   dzīt  gāmām    [d]zīt
SFX (   dzīt  gāmās    [d]zīt
SFX (   dzīt  gāmais   [d]zīt
SFX (   dzīt  gāmajam  [d]zīt
SFX (   dzīt  gāmo     [d]zīt
SFX (   dzīt  gāmajā   [d]zīt
SFX (   dzīt  gāmajai  [d]zīt
SFX (   dzīt  gāmie    [d]zīt
SFX (   dzīt  gāmajiem [d]zīt
SFX (   dzīt  gāmajos  [d]zīt
SFX (   dzīt  gāmajām  [d]zīt
SFX (   dzīt  gāmajās  [d]zīt
SFX (   ēt   ams      [^t][ē]t
SFX (   ēt   ama      [^t][ē]t
SFX (   ēt   amā      [^t][ē]t
SFX (   ēt   amai     [^t][ē]t
SFX (   ēt   amais    [^t][ē]t
SFX (   ēt   amajā    [^t][ē]t
SFX (   ēt   amajai   [^t][ē]t
SFX (   ēt   amajam   [^t][ē]t
SFX (   ēt   amajām   [^t][ē]t
SFX (   ēt   amajās   [^t][ē]t
SFX (   ēt   amajiem  [^t][ē]t
SFX (   ēt   amajos   [^t][ē]t
SFX (   ēt   amam     [^t][ē]t
SFX (   ēt   amām     [^t][ē]t
SFX (   ēt   amas     [^t][ē]t
SFX (   ēt   amās     [^t][ē]t
SFX (   ēt   ami      [^t][ē]t
SFX (   ēt   amie     [^t][ē]t
SFX (   ēt   amiem    [^t][ē]t
SFX (   ēt   amo      [^t][ē]t
SFX (   ēt   amos     [^t][ē]t
SFX (   ēt   amu      [^t][ē]t
SFX (   ēt   amus     [^t][ē]t
SFX (   tēt   tams    [t][ē]t
SFX (   tēt   tama      [t][ē]t
SFX (   tēt   tamā      [t][ē]t
SFX (   tēt   tamai     [t][ē]t
SFX (   tēt   tamais    [t][ē]t
SFX (   tēt   tamajā    [t][ē]t
SFX (   tēt   tamajai   [t][ē]t
SFX (   tēt   tamajam   [t][ē]t
SFX (   tēt   tamajām   [t][ē]t
SFX (   tēt   tamajās   [t][ē]t
SFX (   tēt   tamajiem  [t][ē]t
SFX (   tēt   tamajos   [t][ē]t
SFX (   tēt   tamam     [t][ē]t
SFX (   tēt   tamām     [t][ē]t
SFX (   tēt   tamas     [t][ē]t
SFX (   tēt   tamās     [t][ē]t
SFX (   tēt   tami      [t][ē]t
SFX (   tēt   tamie     [t][ē]t
SFX (   tēt   tamiem    [t][ē]t
SFX (   tēt   tamo      [t][ē]t
SFX (   tēt   tamos     [t][ē]t
SFX (   tēt   tamu      [t][ē]t
SFX (   tēt   tamus     [t][ē]t
SFX (   t   ms      [ā]t
SFX (   t   ma      [ā]t
SFX (   t   mam     [ā]t
SFX (   t   mu      [ā]t
SFX (   t   mā      [ā]t
SFX (   t   mas     [ā]t
SFX (   t   mai     [ā]t
SFX (   t   mi      [ā]t
SFX (   t   miem    [ā]t
SFX (   t   mus     [ā]t
SFX (   t   mos     [ā]t
SFX (   t   mām     [ā]t
SFX (   t   mās     [ā]t
SFX (   t   mais    [ā]t
SFX (   t   majam   [ā]t
SFX (   t   mo      [ā]t
SFX (   t   majā    [ā]t
SFX (   t   majai   [ā]t
SFX (   t   mie     [ā]t
SFX (   t   majiem  [ā]t
SFX (   t   majos   [ā]t
SFX (   t   majām   [ā]t
SFX (   t   majās   [ā]t

SFX n Y 23
SFX n   īt   āms      [c]īt
SFX n   īt   āma      [c]īt
SFX n   īt   āmam     [c]īt
SFX n   īt   āmu      [c]īt
SFX n   īt   āmā      [c]īt
SFX n   īt   āmas     [c]īt
SFX n   īt   āmai     [c]īt
SFX n   īt   āmi      [c]īt
SFX n   īt   āmiem    [c]īt
SFX n   īt   āmus     [c]īt
SFX n   īt   āmos     [c]īt
SFX n   īt   āmām     [c]īt
SFX n   īt   āmās     [c]īt
SFX n   īt   āmais    [c]īt
SFX n   īt   āmajam   [c]īt
SFX n   īt   āmo      [c]īt
SFX n   īt   āmajā    [c]īt
SFX n   īt   āmajai   [c]īt
SFX n   īt   āmie     [c]īt
SFX n   īt   āmajiem  [c]īt
SFX n   īt   āmajos   [c]īt
SFX n   īt   āmajām   [c]īt
SFX n   īt   āmajās   [c]īt

SFX r Y 23
SFX r   īt   oša      [c]īt
SFX r   īt   ošā      [c]īt
SFX r   īt   ošai     [c]īt
SFX r   īt   ošais    [c]īt
SFX r   īt   ošajā    [c]īt
SFX r   īt   ošajai   [c]īt
SFX r   īt   ošajam   [c]īt
SFX r   īt   ošajām   [c]īt
SFX r   īt   ošajās   [c]īt
SFX r   īt   ošajiem  [c]īt
SFX r   īt   ošajos   [c]īt
SFX r   īt   ošam     [c]īt
SFX r   īt   ošām     [c]īt
SFX r   īt   ošas     [c]īt
SFX r   īt   ošās     [c]īt
SFX r   īt   oši      [c]īt
SFX r   īt   ošie     [c]īt
SFX r   īt   ošiem    [c]īt
SFX r   īt   ošo      [c]īt
SFX r   īt   ošos     [c]īt
SFX r   īt   ošs      [c]īt
SFX r   īt   ošu      [c]īt
SFX r   īt   ošus     [c]īt

SFX ^ Y 23
SFX ^   t   stošs     t
SFX ^   t   stoša     t
SFX ^   t   stošam    t
SFX ^   t   stošu     t
SFX ^   t   stošā     t
SFX ^   t   stošas    t
SFX ^   t   stošai    t
SFX ^   t   stoši     t
SFX ^   t   stošiem   t
SFX ^   t   stošus    t
SFX ^   t   stošos    t
SFX ^   t   stošām    t
SFX ^   t   stošās    t
SFX ^   t   stošais   t
SFX ^   t   stošajam  t
SFX ^   t   stošo     t
SFX ^   t   stošajā   t
SFX ^   t   stošajai  t
SFX ^   t   stošie    t
SFX ^   t   stošajiem t
SFX ^   t   stošajos  t
SFX ^   t   stošajām  t
SFX ^   t   stošajās  t

SFX $ Y 23
SFX $   t   jošs     t
SFX $   t   joša     t
SFX $   t   jošam    t
SFX $   t   jošu     t
SFX $   t   jošā     t
SFX $   t   jošas    t
SFX $   t   jošai    t
SFX $   t   joši     t
SFX $   t   jošiem   t
SFX $   t   jošus    t
SFX $   t   jošos    t
SFX $   t   jošām    t
SFX $   t   jošās    t
SFX $   t   jošais   t
SFX $   t   jošajam  t
SFX $   t   jošo     t
SFX $   t   jošajā   t
SFX $   t   jošajai  t
SFX $   t   jošie    t
SFX $   t   jošajiem t
SFX $   t   jošajos  t
SFX $   t   jošajām  t
SFX $   t   jošajās  t
